Indiana, session 2026, HB1238.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.2. (a) The county assessor of each county shall,
before July 1, 2013, and before May 1 of every fourth year thereafter,
prepare and submit to the department of local government finance a
reassessment plan for the county. The following apply to a
reassessment plan prepared and submitted under this section:
(1) The reassessment plan is subject to approval by the
department of local government finance. The department of local
government finance shall complete its review and approval of the
reassessment plan before:
(A) March 1, 2015; and
(B) January 1 of each subsequent year that follows a year in
which the reassessment plan is submitted by the county.
(2) The department of local government finance shall determine
the classes of real property to be used for purposes of this section.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (b), the reassessment plan
2026 IN 1238—LS 6682/DI 134


must divide all parcels of real property in the county into four (4)
different groups of parcels. Each group of parcels must contain
approximately twenty-five percent (25%) of the parcels within
each class of real property in the county.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (b), all real property in each
group of parcels shall be reassessed under the county's
reassessment plan once during each four (4) year cycle.
(5) The reassessment of a group of parcels in a particular class of
real property shall begin on May 1 of a year.
(6) The reassessment of parcels:
(A) must include a physical inspection of each parcel of real
property in the group of parcels that is being reassessed; and
(B) shall be completed on or before January 1 of the year after
the year in which the reassessment of the group of parcels
begins.
(7) For real property included in a group of parcels that is
reassessed, the reassessment is the basis for taxes payable in the
year following the year in which the reassessment is to be
completed.
(8) The reassessment plan must specify the dates by which the
assessor must submit land values under section 13.6 of this
chapter to the county property tax assessment board of appeals.
(9) The department may not approve the reassessment plan until
the assessor provides verification that the land values
determination under section 13.6 of this chapter has been
completed.
(10) Subject to review and approval by the department of local
government finance, the county assessor may modify the
reassessment plan.
(11) Beginning on the January 1, 2027, assessment date, the
assessed value of real property that qualifies as a homestead
under IC 6-1.1-12-37(a)(2) shall only be adjusted upon the
sale, devise, descent, or conveyance of the real property. The
assessed value of the real property may not be adjusted before
the sale, devise, descent, or conveyance of the real property
unless requested by the owner of the real property.
(b) A county may submit a reassessment plan that provides for
reassessing more than twenty-five percent (25%) of all parcels of real
property in the county in a particular year. A plan may provide that all
parcels are to be reassessed in one (1) year. However, a plan must
cover a four (4) year period. All real property in each group of parcels
shall be reassessed under the county's reassessment plan once during
2026 IN 1238—LS 6682/DI 134


each reassessment cycle.
(c) The reassessment of the first group of parcels under a county's
reassessment plan shall begin on July 1, 2014, and shall be completed
on or before January 1, 2015.
(d) The department of local government finance may adopt rules to
govern the reassessment of property under county reassessment plans.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTIONLS 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) The department of local
government finance shall adopt rules establishing a system for annually
adjusting the assessed value of real property, other than real property
that qualifies as a homestead under IC 6-1.1-12-37(a)(2) after
December 31, 2026, to account for changes in value in those years
since a reassessment under section 4.2 of this chapter for the property
last took effect.
(b) Subject to subsection (f), the system must be applied to adjust
assessed values beginning with the 2006 assessment date and each year
thereafter that is not a year in which a reassessment under section 4.2
of this chapter for the property becomes effective.
(c) The rules adopted under subsection (a) must include the
following characteristics in the system:
(1) Promote uniform and equal assessment of real property within
and across classifications.
(2) Require that assessing officials:
(A) reevaluate the factors that affect value;
(B) express the interactions of those factors mathematically;
(C) use mass appraisal techniques to estimate updated property
values within statistical measures of accuracy; and
(D) provide notice to taxpayers of an assessment increase that
results from the application of annual adjustments.
(3) Prescribe procedures that permit the application of the
adjustment percentages in an efficient manner by assessing
officials.
(d) The department of local government finance must review and
certify each annual adjustment determined under this section.
(e) For an assessment beginning after December 31, 2022,
agricultural improvements such as but not limited to barns, grain bins,
or silos on land assessed as agricultural shall not be adjusted using
factors, such as neighborhood delineation, that are appropriate for use
in adjusting residential, commercial, and industrial real property. Those
portions of agricultural parcels that include land and buildings not used
for an agricultural purpose, such as homes, homesites, and excess
2026 IN 1238—LS 6682/DI 134


residential land and commercial or industrial land and buildings, shall
be adjusted by the factor or factors developed for other similar property
within the geographic stratification. The residential portion of
agricultural properties shall be adjusted by the factors applied to
similar residential purposes.
(f) In making the annual determination of the base rate to satisfy the
requirement for an annual adjustment for each assessment date, the
department of local government finance shall, not later than March 1
of each year, determine the base rate using the methodology reflected
in Table 2-18 of Book 1, Chapter 2 of the department of local
government finance's Real Property Assessment Guidelines (as in
effect on January 1, 2005), except that the department shall adjust the
methodology as follows:
(1) Use a six (6) year rolling average adjusted under subdivision
(3) instead of a four (4) year rolling average.
(2) Use the data from the six (6) most recent years preceding the
year in which the assessment date occurs for which data is
available, before one (1) of those six (6) years is eliminated under
subdivision (3) when determining the rolling average.
(3) Eliminate in the calculation of the rolling average the year
among the six (6) years for which the highest market value in use
of agricultural land is determined.
(4) After determining a preliminary base rate that would apply for
the assessment date without applying the adjustment under this
subdivision, the department of local government finance shall
adjust the preliminary base rate as follows:
(A) If the preliminary base rate for the assessment date would
be at least ten percent (10%) greater than the final base rate
determined for the preceding assessment date, a capitalization
rate of:
(i) for purposes of determining the preliminary base rate for
the January 1, 2025, and the January 1, 2026, assessment
dates, nine percent (9%); and
(ii) for purposes of determining the preliminary base rate for
assessment dates before January 1, 2025, and for assessment
dates after December 31, 2026, eight percent (8%);
shall be used to determine the final base rate.
(B) If the preliminary base rate for the assessment date would
be at least ten percent (10%) less than the final base rate
determined for the preceding assessment date, a capitalization
rate of six percent (6%) shall be used to determine the final
base rate.
2026 IN 1238—LS 6682/DI 134


(C) If neither clause (A) nor clause (B) applies, a capitalization
rate of seven percent (7%) shall be used to determine the final
base rate.
(D) In the case of a market value in use for a year that is used
in the calculation of the six (6) year rolling average under
subdivision (1) for purposes of determining the base rate for
the assessment date:
(i) that market value in use shall be recalculated by using the
capitalization rate determined under clauses (A) through (C)
for the calculation of the base rate for the assessment date;
and
(ii) the market value in use recalculated under item (i) shall
be used in the calculation of the six (6) year rolling average
under subdivision (1).
(g) For assessment dates after December 31, 2009, an adjustment in
the assessed value of real property under this section shall be based on
the estimated true tax value of the property on the assessment date that
is the basis for taxes payable on that real property.
(h) The department shall release the department's annual
determination of the base rate on or before March 1 of each year.
(i) For the January 1, 2025, assessment date only, the base rate
determined using the capitalization rate under subsection (f)(4)(A)(i)
shall not apply to land that is assessed under section 12 of this chapter.
(j) Beginning on the January 1, 2027, assessment date, the
assessed value of real property that qualifies as a homestead under
IC 6-1.1-12-37(a)(2) shall only be adjusted upon the sale, devise,
descent, or conveyance of the real property. The assessed value of
the real property may not be adjusted before the sale, devise,
descent, or conveyance of the real property unless requested by the
owner of the real property.
2026 IN 1238—LS 6682/DI 134